Utah statutes.
65A-12-1.   Authority of division to manage lands granted under the Carey
Act.
The selection, management, and disposal of lands granted by Congress under the
Carey Act is vested in the division, which is authorized to make rules and
contracts necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
